District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-908

Bylaws; adoption, amendment, or repeal.

Repealed.

June 19, 1940, 54 Stat. 483, ch. 397, § 8
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(q), 58 DCR 1720

History

2001 Ed., § 29-908.
1981 Ed., § 29-1108.
1973 Ed., § 29-808.

Prior Codifications